Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.616

Health education—Funding to support promotoras.

(1) Subject to the availability of funds for this specific purpose, the department of health shall provide funding to support promotoras in at least two communities. These promotoras shall provide culturally sensitive, lay health education for the Latinx community, and act as liaisons between their community, health professionals, and human and social service organizations.

(2) In determining which communities will be served by the promotoras under this section, the department of health shall provide funding to support one community west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and one community east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

[ 2024 c 328 s 205.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 328: See note following RCW 13.34.050.